Wisconsin, session 2025, AB743.
do enact as follows:AB743,14Section 1. 973.017 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB743,2,31973.017 (2) (b) Any applicable mitigating factors and any applicable 2aggravating factors, including the mitigating and aggravating factors specified in 3subs. (3) to (8) (8m).AB743,24Section 2. 973.017 (8m) of the statutes is created to read:AB743,2,75973.017 (8m) Mitigating factors; offenses committed by a veteran. (a) 6In this subsection, “veteran” means a person who served in the U.S. armed forces or 7in forces incorporated as part of the U.S. armed forces.AB743,2,118(b) When making a sentencing decision concerning a person who is a veteran, 9the court may consider as a mitigating factor that the person has been diagnosed as 10suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder resulting from his or her military 11service.AB743,312Section 3. Initial applicability.AB743,2,1413(1) This act first applies to offenses committed on the effective date of this 14subsection.AB743,2,1515